Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.240

Lien proceedings not to delay sale.

The proceedings to ascertain the amount of the liens, and to determine their priority as above provided, or those hereinafter authorized to determine the rights of parties to funds paid into court, shall not delay the sale, nor affect any other party, whose rights are not involved in such proceedings.

[Code 1881 s 575; 1877 p 121 s 578; 1869 p 137 s 528; RRS s 861.]